North Carolina, session 2025, SB845.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), the sum of one hundred
forty-two thousand dollars ($142,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year
and the sum of three hundred thirty-five thousand eight hundred eighty dollars ($335,880) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to county departments of social
services to provide new luggage to a child placed in foster care who is being removed from a
household. These funds shall be used to provide new luggage to (i) children who are new entrants
into the foster care system and (ii) children currently in foster care. The Department may solicit
and accept gifts, grants, and donations of any kind and from any source in implementing the
provisions of this act. For purposes of this act, "new luggage" means a suitcase, duffel bag,
backpack, or similar container that is designed to hold an individual's personal belongings and
has not previously been used. The term does not include a disposable bag.
SECTION 1.(b) By December 1 of each year, the Division shall submit a report to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal
Research Division on each of the following:
(1) The number of instances a disposable bag was used to transport the personal
belongings of a child in foster care and the reason the county department of
social services responsible for placement of the child failed to provide the
child with new luggage.
(2) The supply and inventory management procedures for the new luggage
supply.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S845-v-1*